Utah, session 2026, SB244.
Section 1. Section 53G-9-216 is enacted to read:53G-9-216. Cardiac emergency response plans.(1)As used in this section:(a)"AED" means automated external defibrillator.(b)"Cardiac emergency response plan" or "CERP" means a plan developed by a school that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds.(c)"Emergency cardiovascular care" means immediate medical care provided to an individual experiencing a life-threatening cardiovascular emergency.(d)"Evidence-based core elements" means practices and standards for emergency cardiovascular care that are:(i)recommended by the American Heart Association; or(ii)nationally recognized, evidence-based standards focused on emergency cardiovascular care.(e)"High-needs school" means a school:(i)designated as a Title I school under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.; or(ii)where more than 50% of students are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch under the National School Lunch Program.(2)Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each school within an LEA shall develop a CERP that integrates evidence-based core elements.(3)An LEA shall ensure each school's CERP includes:(a)appropriate placement of an AED that:(i)is determined by the CERP in accordance with guidelines for AED placement that an organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care establishes;(ii)is identified with appropriate signage;(iii)is on-site at the school or placed on school property in a location that is accessible within three minutes; and (iv)is maintained in an unlocked location on school property that enables placement on a victim within three minutes; and(b)(i)designation of appropriate school staff to be trained in:(A)first aid;(B)cardiopulmonary resuscitation, or CPR; and(C)AED use that follows evidence-based guidelines; and(ii)for the training under Subsection (3)(b)(i), relevant staff to attend the training, which may include:(A)an educator;(B)a school nurse; or(C)an athletic trainer.(4)(a)An LEA shall ensure that each AED shall be tested and maintained according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.(b)Each school within an LEA shall provide notification to the appropriate first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad or other appropriate emergency medical services provider regarding the AED, the type acquired, and the AED's location.(5)(a)Subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall distribute grant money for implementing a CERP on a first-come, first-served basis to LEAs with a demonstrated need as the state board determines.(b)The state board shall ensure grant money under this section be used for activities and equipment that further promote CERP preparedness, including:(i)the purchase of an AED;(ii)AED maintenance, including pads and battery replacement;(iii)the purchase of CPR training kits or CPR training for faculty and staff;(iv)basic first aid training; and(v)educational materials.(c)In awarding grants under this section, the state board shall give priority to high-needs schools.(6)An LEA may accept gifts, grants, and donations, including in-kind donations designated for the purchase of an AED that meets the standards established by the United States Food and Drug Administration and for the costs incurred to inspect and maintain an AED and train school staff in the use of an AED.(7)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the state board may make rules to establish:(a)grant application and distribution criteria; and(b)compliance and monitoring for the requirements described under this section.

Section 2:
Section 2.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 2(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 1State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time200,000Contracts and Grants200,000

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.